Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 14 Trustee Liability

53-12-300.
Accountable to beneficiary; breach of trust.

The trustee shall be accountable to the beneficiary for the trust property. A violation by the trustee of any duty that the trustee owes the beneficiary shall be a breach of trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-300

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Cross references.

Registration of securities generally, §

10-5-20

et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Georgia Trust Act,” 28 Ga. St. B.J. 95 (1991).

53-12-301.
Actions for breach of trust.

If a trustee commits a breach of trust, or threatens to commit a breach of trust, a beneficiary shall have a cause of action to seek:

To recover damages;

To compel the trustee to perform the trustee’s duties;

To require an accounting;

To enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust;

To compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by payment of money or otherwise;

To appoint a temporary trustee to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust or to suspend a trustee with or without the appointment of a temporary trustee;

To remove the trustee; and

To reduce or deny compensation of the trustee.

When trust assets are misapplied and can be traced in the hands of persons affected with notice of the misapplication, the trust shall attach to such assets. A creditor of a trust may follow assets in the hands of beneficiaries even if they were received without notice.

The remedy set forth in subsection (c) of Code Section 53-12-363 shall be the exclusive remedy for an abuse of discretion as provided in Code Sections 53-12-361 and 53-12-362.

The provision of remedies for breach of trust shall not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-301

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Cross references.

Registration of securities generally, §

10-5-20

et seq.

Effect of purchase by or from one without notice of equity, §

23-1-19

.

Liability of the legatees or distributees with respect to an unpaid debt of the estate, §

53-7-43

.

53-12-302.
Damages for breach of trust; interest.

A trustee who commits a breach of trust shall be personally chargeable with any damages resulting from such breach of trust, including, but not limited to:

Any loss or depreciation in value of the trust property as a result of such breach of trust, with interest;

Any profit made by the trustee through such breach of trust, with interest;

Any amount that would reasonably have accrued to the trust or beneficiary if there had been no breach of trust, with interest; and

In the discretion of the court, expenses of litigation, including reasonable attorney’s fees incurred in bringing an action on such breach or threat to commit such breach.

If the trustee is liable for interest, then the amount of the liability for interest shall be the greater of:

The amount of interest that accrues at the legal rate on judgments; or

The amount of interest actually received.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-302

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-303.
Relief of liability.

No provision in a trust instrument shall be effective to relieve the trustee of liability for a breach of trust committed in bad faith or with reckless indifference to the interests of the beneficiaries.

A trustee of a revocable trust shall not be liable to a beneficiary for any act performed or omitted pursuant to written direction from a person holding the power to revoke, including a person to whom the power to revoke the trust is delegated. If the trust is revocable in part, then this subsection shall apply with respect to the interest of the beneficiary in that part of the trust property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-303

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 23/HB 121.

Law reviews.

For article on the problems and benefits of multiple fiduciaries in estate planning, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 355 (1981).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

53-12-304.
Liability of successor trustee.

A successor trustee shall be liable to the beneficiary for breach of trust involving acts or omissions of a predecessor trustee only if the successor trustee:

Knows or reasonably should have known of a situation constituting a breach of trust committed by the predecessor trustee and the successor trustee improperly permits it to continue;

Neglects to take reasonable steps to compel the predecessor to deliver the trust property to the successor trustee; or

Neglects to take reasonable steps to redress a breach of trust committed by the predecessor trustee in a case where the successor trustee knows or reasonably should have known of the predecessor trustee’s breach.

A trustee succeeding a trustee who was also the settlor shall not be liable to the beneficiary for any action taken or omitted to be taken by the prior trustee nor shall such successor trustee have a duty to institute any action against such prior trustee or to file any claim against such prior trustee’s estate for any of the prior trustee’s acts or omissions as trustee. This subsection shall apply only with respect to a trust or any portion of a trust that was revocable by the settlor during the time that the settlor served as trustee and committed the act or omission.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-304

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 53/HB 142.

53-12-305.
Liability of cotrustee.

A trustee shall be liable to the beneficiary for a breach committed by a cotrustee if such trustee:

Participates in a breach of trust committed by the cotrustee;

Improperly delegates the administration of the trust to the cotrustee;

Approves, knowingly acquiesces in, or conceals a breach of trust committed by the cotrustee;

Negligently enables the cotrustee to commit a breach of trust; or

Neglects to take reasonable steps to compel the cotrustee to redress a breach of trust in a case where such trustee knows or reasonably should have known of the breach of trust.

If two or more cotrustees are jointly liable to the beneficiary, each cotrustee shall be entitled to contribution from the other, as determined by the degree of each cotrustee’s fault.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-305

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-306.
Action against cotrustee.

A trustee may maintain an action against a cotrustee to:

Compel the cotrustee to perform duties required under the trust;

Enjoin the cotrustee from committing a breach of trust; or

Compel the cotrustee to redress a breach of trust committed by such cotrustee.

The provision of remedies for a breach of trust shall not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or common law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-306

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-307.
Limitation of actions.

Unless a claim is previously barred by adjudication, consent, limitation, or otherwise, if a beneficiary has received a written report that adequately discloses the existence of a claim against the trustee for a breach of trust, the claim shall be barred as to that beneficiary unless a proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within two years after receipt of the report. A report adequately discloses existence of a claim if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary knows of such claim or reasonably should have inquired into the existence of such claim. If the beneficiary has not received a report which adequately discloses the existence of a claim against the trustee for a breach of trust, such claim shall be barred as to that beneficiary unless a proceeding to assert such claim is commenced within six years after the beneficiary discovered, or reasonably should have discovered, the subject of such claim.

A successor trustee’s claim against a predecessor trustee shall be barred unless a proceeding to assert such claim is commenced within two years after such successor trustee takes office.

A trustee’s claim against a cotrustee shall be barred unless a proceeding to assert such claim is commenced within two years after the date the cause of action against the cotrustee arises.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-307

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

53-12-308.
Personal liability of trustee.

A trustee shall not be personally liable on any warranty made in any conveyance unless the intention to create a personal liability is distinctly expressed.

Unless otherwise provided in the contract, a trustee shall not be personally liable on contracts properly entered into in the trustee’s fiduciary capacity unless the trustee fails to reveal the trustee’s representative capacity in the contract.

A judgment rendered in an action brought against the trust shall impose no personal liability on the trustee or the beneficiary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-308

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For article, “Noticing the Bankruptcy Sale: The Purchased Property May Not Be as ‘Free and Clear of All Liens, Claims and Encumberances’ as You Think,”
see 15 (No. 5) Ga. St. B.J. 12 (2010).